Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-155] Determination of eligibility of
tenants and rental charges. (a) For purposes of carrying out this part,
the authority shall establish criteria and procedures for determining the
eligibility of tenants and rental charges, including criteria and procedures
with respect to periodic review of the tenant's income and periodic adjustment
of rental charges. The authority shall issue, upon the request of a housing
owner, certificates as to the income of the individuals and families applying
for admission to, or residing in, dwellings of that owner.

(b) Procedures adopted by the authority
hereunder shall provide for recertification of the incomes of tenants, except
elders, at intervals of two years, or at shorter intervals, for the purpose of
adjusting rental charges and annual payments on the basis of tenants' incomes,
but in no event shall rental charges adjusted under this part for any dwelling
exceed the fair market rental of the dwelling.

(c) No payments under this part may be made
with respect to any property for which the costs of operation, including wages
and salaries, are determined by the authority to be greater than similar costs
of operation of similar housing in the community where the property is
situated. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next